Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB658.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6102YC (1) 91 ss/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 99D.7, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 3. To adopt standards regarding the duration of 3 thoroughbred and quarter horse racing seasons, so that a 4 thoroughbred racing season shall not be less than sixty-seven 5 days, and so that a quarter horse racing season shall not be 6 less than twenty-six days. The thoroughbred and quarter horse 7 racing seasons shall be run independently unless mutually 8 agreed upon by the associations representing the thoroughbred 9 and quarter horse owners and the licensee of the horse 10 racetrack located in Polk county. 11 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 99D.7A Thoroughbred and quarter horse 12 racing seasons. 13 1. Thoroughbred and quarter horse racing seasons shall be 14 conducted as separate stand-alone meets that do not overlap, 15 other than as provided in this section. A race for one breed 16 shall not be scheduled or conducted on the same calendar day as 17 a race for the other breed, and the racing season for one breed 18 shall not commence until the racing season for the other breed 19 has concluded, unless mutually agreed upon in writing by the 20 associations representing the thoroughbred and quarter horse 21 owners and the licensee of the horse racetrack located in Polk 22 county. 23 2. An arrangement in which races for both thoroughbreds and 24 quarter horses are scheduled during overlapping or concurrent 25 periods shall be deemed a mixed meet and shall only occur 26 pursuant to a mutual written agreement under subsection 1. 27 Sec. 3. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS. The general assembly finds 28 that a recent decision or interpretation of the state racing 29 and gaming commission suggesting that thoroughbred and quarter 30 horse races may be held on the same calendar day without the 31 agreement of the associations representing the thoroughbred and 32 quarter horse owners and the licensee of the horse racetrack 33 located in Polk county, does not comply with the requirement in 34 section 99D.7, subsection 3, that such races run independently. 35 -1- LSB 6102YC (1) 91 ss/ns 1/ 2 H.F. _____